Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1411
Federation of associations; acquisition of stock or membership; agreements.

To effectuate the formation of federations of nonprofit associations of producers, any such association of producers whether formed hereunder or not is hereby authorized to acquire membership or stock in any other such association of producers, and any such association is hereby authorized to grant such membership or sell such stock to such associations, and any association may, upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements, and make all necessary and proper stipulations, agreements and contracts with any other cooperative corporation, association, or associations, formed in this or in any other state, for the cooperative and more economical carrying out of its business, or any part thereof. Any two or more associations may, by agreement between them, unite in employing and using or may separately employ and use the same methods, means, and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective business.

Laws 1925, c. 80, § 11, p. 252;

C.S.1929, § 24-1411;

R.S.1943, § 21-1411.